Washington statutes.
RCW 42.26.080

Violation of petty cash account requirements.

If a post audit by the state auditor discloses the amount of the petty cash account of any agency under this chapter to be excessive or the use of the account to be in violation of requirements governing its operation, the director of financial management may require the return of the account or of the excessive amount to the state treasury for credit to the fund from which the advance was made.

[ 1979 c 151 s 78; 1969 ex.s. c 60 s 8.]